test/src/morphology/V-jurdded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - juˊrdded: # Verb 'to think, to consider' - full paradigm
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joordam
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: joordak
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jordd
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juˊrddep
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juˊrddveˊted
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joˊrdde
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+4: juuˊrdet
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juˊrddem
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juˊrddiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juuˊrdi
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [juuˊrdim, juuˊrdin]
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juuˊrdid
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juˊrdde
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+4: juˊrddeš 
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg1: juuˊrdžem
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg2: juuˊrdžiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg3: juuˊrdež
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [juuˊrdžep, juuˊrdžim]
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl2: juuˊrdžid
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl3: juuˊrdže
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+4: juuˊrdžet
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: juuˊrdže
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg2: joordčiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg3: joordči
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [joordčim, joordčep]
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl2: joordčid
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl3: joordče
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+4: joordčeš
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: joordče
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Sg2: juuˊrd
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Sg3: joordas
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl1: juˊrddep
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl2: juˊrdded
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl3: jorddaz
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+ConNeg: jurddu
     juˊrdded+V+Action: juˊrddem
     juˊrdded+V+ActEss: juˊrddmen
     juˊrdded+V+PrsPrc: juˊrddi
     juˊrdded+V+PrfPrc: jorddam
     juˊrdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: jurddum
     juˊrdded+V+VAbess: [juuˊrdkâni, juuˊrdkani, juuˊrdǩeânai]
     juˊrdded+V+GerTemp: juuˊrdeen
     juˊrdded+V+GerInstr: juuˊrdeeˊl
